New York, session 2025-2026, A10531.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 4 of section 2004-a of the 2 public health law, as amended by section 4 of part A of chapter 58 of 3 the laws of 2008, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) The council shall meet quarterly or more frequently if its busi- 5 ness shall require. The community forums in the first year of implemen- 6 tation count as a formal meeting of the council. Videoconferencing may 7 be used for attendance and participation by members of the council in 8 accordance with written procedures adopted by the council. Any member 9 attending and participating by the use of videoconferencing shall be 10 considered to be present at the meeting. The members of the council 11 shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel and 12 other expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of 13 their duties. The council shall provide reports to the governor and the 14 legislature on or before June thirtieth, two thousand nine and by June 15 thirtieth of every other year thereafter. Such reports shall include 16 recommendations for state policy relating to dementia and a review of 17 services initiated and coordinated among public and private agencies to 18 meet the needs of persons with Alzheimer's disease and other dementia 19 and their families. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13706-01-5